Hawaii, session 2026, GM1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. There is appropriated out of the general
2 revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,750,000 or so much
3 thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
4 purchase of one advanced life support ambulance and related
S equipment to be based in the central Maui area of the county of
6 Maui, and to fund pay-related personnel costs for one state-
7 certified emergency medical technician and one state-certified
8 paramedic.
9 The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
10 health for the purposes of this Act.
11 SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2449 SB2934 CDl SMA-2.docx
mimiiiHiHiHiiHiiniiniin

2934
S.B. NO
APPROVED this 4th day of June , 2026
W
±
d
Q
Q
Q
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2934, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai ‘ i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President
Clerk of the Senate
206-26

SB No. 2934, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives